Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5872YH (4) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2370 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 35E.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âAt-risk veteranâ means a veteran who is reported missing 4 under circumstances indicating the veteran may be experiencing 5 a mental health crisis, emotional distress, cognitive 6 impairment, substance-related impairment, or other condition 7 creating a credible concern for the veteranâs well-being. 8 2. âDepartmentâ means the department of public safety. 9 3. âGreen alertâ means a confidential, nonpublic 10 notification to facilitate professional coordination for the 11 safe location and voluntary assistance of a missing at-risk 12 veteran. 13 4. âVeteranâ means an individual who served in the armed 14 forces of the United States and who was discharged or released 15 under conditions other than dishonorable. 16 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 35E.2 Green alert system. 17 1. The department shall establish and administer a green 18 alert system to support wellness-oriented location efforts for 19 missing at-risk veterans. 20 2. A green alert shall be activated if all of the following 21 conditions are met: 22 a. A veteran is reported missing. 23 b. The person requesting a green alert provides specific 24 facts indicating a potential threat to the veteranâs 25 well-being. 26 c. The department receives the name, contact information, 27 and relationship to the veteran of the person requesting a 28 green alert. 29 d. A peace officer or designated public safety official 30 independently verifies the credibility of the report and 31 determines that activation of a green alert is appropriate. 32 3. The verifying officer or official shall document the 33 basis for activating a green alert. 34 4. The department shall review the status of the green 35 -1- LSB 5872YH (4) 91 sc/ns 1/ 5 H.F. 2370 alert every seventy-two hours and terminate the green alert 1 immediately upon verification that the at-risk veteran has been 2 located or the risk has passed. 3 5. A person who knowingly submits a false report under this 4 section violates section 718.6. 5 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 35E.3 Confidentiality. 6 1. The department shall not disseminate a green alert to 7 the general public and shall not utilize an emergency broadcast 8 system, wireless emergency alert, highway message sign, social 9 media, or other publicly accessible notification method. 10 2. The department shall only disseminate information 11 related to an active green alert to the following entities: 12 a. A law enforcement agency. 13 b. A hospital or urgent care facility. 14 c. Emergency medical services. 15 d. A community mental health provider or crisis response 16 team. 17 e. A veterans service organization or veteran peer support 18 program approved by the department. 19 f. A professional service entity reasonably believed to be 20 able to assist in locating or supporting the at-risk veteran. 21 3. The department shall only disseminate information 22 reasonably necessary for identification of and voluntary 23 contact with an at-risk veteran. 24 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 35E.4 Green alert response. 25 1. A response associated with a green alert must prioritize 26 de-escalation, voluntary engagement, and trauma-informed 27 practices. 28 2. An agency responding to a green alert shall, when 29 feasible, involve a crisis intervention team, veteran peer 30 support specialist, or mental health professional trained to 31 work with veterans. 32 3. Veteran status, mental health history, or 33 service-related trauma shall not be presumed to indicate 34 dangerousness. 35 -2- LSB 5872YH (4) 91 sc/ns 2/ 5 H.F. 2370 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 35E.5 Prohibited uses. 1 Activation of a green alert does not create probable cause or 2 reasonable suspicion of criminal activity and shall not be used 3 to do any of the following: 4 1. Initiate an arrest absent independent probable cause. 5 2. Conduct a warrantless detention. 6 3. Justify involuntary commitment. 7 4. Circumvent constitutional protections or statutory due 8 process requirements. 9 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 35E.6 Priority. 10 The green alert system must operate independently from 11 public emergency alert channels. Activation of a green 12 alert shall not delay or interfere with the prioritization 13 of a public emergency alert related to child abduction or an 14 imminent threat to the public. 15 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 35E.7 Data collection. 16 1. The department shall maintain annual statistics on the 17 green alert system, including the number of alerts issued, 18 the resolution of alerts, and verified false reports, while 19 ensuring all personally identifiable information is protected. 20 2. The department shall not publicly release personally 21 identifiable information related to a green alert unless the 22 veteran or the veteranâs legal representative affirmatively 23 consents to the release of the information. 24 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 35E.8 Rules. 25 The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A as 26 necessary to administer this chapter. 27